Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1087.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE XVIII-IACTIVE VOLUNTEER FIRST RESPONDEREDUCATION TAX CREDITSection 1801-I. Scope of article.This article relates to the Active Volunteer First Responder Tax Credit.12345678910111213141516171819202122 Section 1802-I. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Active volunteer first responder." A volunteer for a volunteer fire company or nonprofit emergency medical services agency who is certified under 35 Pa.C.S. § 79A23 (relating to certification)."Approved institution of higher learning." Any of the following:(1) A public college or technical institute that is established and operated in accordance with the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, by a local sponsor that provides a two-year, postsecondary, college-parallel, terminal-general, terminal-technical, out-of-school youth or adult education program or any combination of the programs.(2) An institution that is part of the State System of Higher Education under Article XX-A of the Public School Code of 1949, and all branches and campuses of a State-owned institution."Approved program of education." A curriculum or course of study pursued at an approved institution of higher learning."Business firm." An entity authorized to do business in this Commonwealth and subject to taxes imposed under Article III, IV, VI, VII, VIII, IX, XV or XX or a tax imposed under Article XVI of the act of May 17, 1921 (P.L.682, No.284), known as The Insurance Company Law of 1921. The term includes a pass-through entity, including a pass-through entity the purpose of which is making contributions under this article and whose shareholders, 20250HB1087PN1204 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 partners or members are composed of owners or employees of other business firms."Contribution." A donation of cash, personal property or services, the value of which is the net cost of the donation to the donor or the pro rata hourly wage, including benefits, of the individual performing the service."Department." The Department of Community and Economic Development of the Commonwealth."Eligible organization." An approved institution of higher learning that is determined to be eligible by the department."Eligible student." An active volunteer first responder who meets the following criteria:(1) Is a resident of this Commonwealth.(2) Has been an active volunteer first responder for a period of at least one year in this Commonwealth.(3) Has enrolled as a student in an approved program of education at an approved institution of higher learning.(4) Provides the approved institution of higher learning with a sworn or official statement by the Office of the State Fire Commissioner or the chief or president of the volunteer emergency medical services agency, attesting that the applicant is a member in good standing of the volunteer emergency medical services agency or volunteer fire company."Nonprofit emergency medical services agency." An emergency medical services agency, as defined in 35 Pa.C.S. § 8103 (relating to definitions), that is chartered as a nonprofit corporation."Program." The Active Volunteer First Responder Education Tax Credit Program established under section 1803-I(a)."Scholarship." An award under this article to pay tuition 20250HB1087PN1204 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and school-related fees to attend an approved institution of higher learning."School-related fees." A fee charged by an approved institution of higher learning to all students for books, instructional materials, technology equipment and services, uniforms and activities."Tax credit." The tax credit authorized under this article."Volunteer fire company." A nonprofit chartered corporation, association or organization, located in this Commonwealth that provides fire protection services and may offer other voluntary emergency services within this Commonwealth.Section 1803-I. Active Volunteer First Responder Education Tax Credit Program.(a) Establishment.--The Active Volunteer First Responder Education Tax Credit Program is established to assist active volunteer first responders with access to higher education by an approved institution of higher learning. The department shall administer the program.(b) Eligible organization application.--In order to qualify for contributions under this article, an eligible organization must submit information to the department to confirm that the eligible organization offers accredited degrees or certificate programs. The information shall be submitted on a form provided by the department.(c) Restriction on use of contributions.--The contributions received by an eligible organization from a business firm claiming a tax credit under this article must be used for scholarships awarded to eligible students.(d) Publication.--The department shall do all of the following:20250HB1087PN1204 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) Annually transmit a list of each eligible organization under this section to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.(2) Post and update the list under paragraph (1) as necessary on the publicly accessible Internet website of the department.Section 1804-I. Business firm.(a) Business firm application.--A business firm may apply to the department for a tax credit for contributions made to an eligible organization that appears on the list under section 1803-I(d)(1) on a form provided by the department.(b) Notification.--No later than 60 days after the organization or business firm has submitted the application required under this section, the department shall notify the eligible organization and business firm whether the eligible organization and business firm meet the requirements under this article for the fiscal year.(c) Contributions.--A contribution by a business firm to an eligible organization must be made no later than 60 days following the approval of an application under subsection (b).Section 1805-I. Award of scholarships.(a) Eligible organizations.--An eligible organization shall award an eligible student a scholarship of up to $5,000 per eligible student to attend an approved institution of higher learning. The award of a scholarship shall be based on enrollment status as follows:(1) A full-time student who is enrolled in at least six credits per semester shall be eligible to receive a scholarship of up to $5,000.20250HB1087PN1204 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) A part-time student who is enrolled in at least three credits per semester shall be eligible to receive a scholarship of up to $2,500.(b) Requirements.--An eligible student must do all of the following:(1) Apply to the department for a scholarship under the program.(2) Be enrolled as a student at an approved institution of higher learning.(3) Be enrolled as a student in an approved program of education.(4) Obtain signatures on the application attesting to the individual's status as an active volunteer first responder of:(i) the chief or president of the volunteer fire company or volunteer rescue company and another officer of the volunteer fire company or volunteer rescue company; or(ii) the chief or president of the emergency medical services agency and another officer of the emergency medical services agency.(5) Upon completion of an accredited degree or certificate program, maintain active volunteer first responder status for at least five years.(c) Penalty.--If an eligible student does not maintain active volunteer first responder status for five years upon completion of an approved program of education the eligible student must pay back 20% per year pro rata of the awarded scholarship.Section 1806-I. Grant of tax credit.20250HB1087PN1204 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Authorization.--In accordance with section 1804-I, the department shall grant a tax credit certificate. The certificate may be used against a tax liability owed to the Department of Revenue by a business firm that provides proof of a contribution to a provider in the taxable year in which the contribution is made. The business firm may apply the credit against any tax due under Article III, IV, VI, VII, VIII, IX or XV, except for any tax withheld by an employer under Article III.(b) Availability of tax credits.--Tax credits under this section shall be made available by the department on a first-come, first-served basis.(c) Limitation.--The tax credit may not exceed 50% of the total amount contributed by a business firm to an eligible organization during the taxable year of the business firm. The tax credit shall not exceed $2,500 annually per business firm.(d) Additional amount.--(1) A business firm that contributes to a provider in two or more consecutive years shall qualify for a 90% tax credit for the contributions made in the second year and every consecutive year of making a contribution to a provider.(2) Nothing under this subsection may be construed to require a business firm to contribute to the same eligible organization every year in order for the business firm to qualify for a tax credit under this subsection.(e) Pass-through entity.--(1) If a pass-through entity does not intend to use each approved tax credit under this section, the pass-through entity may elect in writing to distribute for no consideration all or a portion of the credit to shareholders, 20250HB1087PN1204 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 members or partners in proportion to the percentage interest of the shareholder, member or partner in distributions from the pass-through entity. The credits may be used by the shareholders, members or partners in the taxable year in which the contribution is made or in the taxable year immediately following the year in which the contribution is made. The election shall designate the year in which the distributed credits are to be used and shall be made according to procedures established by the Department of Revenue. A pass-through entity that received a distribution from a pass-through entity under this paragraph may make a distribution under this paragraph.(2) A pass-through entity and a shareholder, member or partner of a pass-through entity may not claim the credit under this section for the same contribution.(3) A shareholder, member or partner may not carry forward, carry back, obtain a refund of or sell or assign the credit.(4) An individual shareholder, partner or member may apply a credit distributed under this section to income taxable under Article III to the shareholder, partner or member, to the spouse of the shareholder, partner or member or to both, if both the shareholder, partner or member and the spouse report income on a joint personal income tax return.Section 1807-I. Amount of tax credit.(a) Limitation.--The total aggregate amount of all tax credits approved under this article may not exceed $10,000,000 in a fiscal year.(b) Activities.--A tax credit may not be approved for 20250HB1087PN1204 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 activities that are part of a business firm's normal course of business.(c) Tax liability.--(1) A tax credit granted for any one taxable year may not exceed the tax liability of a business firm.(2) A tax credit granted to a pass-through entity that elects to distribute the granted tax credit according to section 1806-I(a) for any one taxable year to a shareholder, member or partner may not exceed the tax liability of the shareholder, member or partner.(d) Use.--A tax credit not used in the taxable year the contribution was made may not be carried forward or carried back and is not refundable or transferable.Section 1808-I. Guidelines.The department, in consultation with the Department of Revenue, shall establish guidelines to implement this article within 90 days of the effective date of this section.Section 1809-I. Limitation.A business firm may not apply for a tax credit after the seventh fiscal year following the effective date of this section.Section 2. The addition of Article XVIII-I of the act shall apply to taxable years commencing after December 31, 2025.Section 3. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB1087PN1204 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324